Utah statutes.
73-28-105.   Project Management Committee created.

(1)  There is created a Project Management Committee within the division.

(2) (a)  The committee shall be comprised of one representative appointed by:

(i)  the division director;

(ii)  the board; and

(iii)  each of the participating districts.

(b)  The division representative is the chair of the committee.

(3) (a)  The members shall serve a four-year term.

(b)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term in the same manner as the vacated member was appointed.

(4) (a)  A majority of the members of the committee constitute a quorum of the committee.

(b)  The action of a majority of a quorum constitutes the action of the committee.

(5)  The committee shall:

(a)  consult with the board on a regular basis concerning:

(i)  the development and construction of the project;

(ii)  the operation, maintenance, repair, and replacement of the project; and

(iii)  the prices of developed water and electricity; and

(b)  approve all expenditures from the fund created in Section 73-28-404.

